Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.165.065

Monitoring.

To ensure that school districts are meeting the requirements of this chapter, the superintendent of public instruction shall monitor learning assistance programs using, at minimum, data reported as required under RCW 28A.165.100, no less than once every four years. The primary purpose of program monitoring is to evaluate the effectiveness of a school district's allocation and expenditure of resources and monitor school district fidelity in implementing best practices using the framework of the Washington integrated student supports protocol, established under RCW 28A.300.139. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may provide technical assistance to school districts to improve the effectiveness of a learning assistance program.

[ 2021 c 111 s 7; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 206; 2004 c 20 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 111: See notes following RCW 28A.300.139.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.